Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-316
Rules and regulations; special permits; fish-related activities.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which include (1) provisions for scientific, educational, or private wildlife management purposes as provided in section 37-418, (2) provisions for commercial fishing as provided in sections 37-4,104 and 37-543, (3) provisions for bait dealers as provided in section 37-4,105, and (4) provisions for aquaculturists as provided in section 37-468.

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-111;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 74;

Laws 2001, LB 130, § 1.